Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 13.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201279-8,138
Repayment
tracking.

The department has the administrative
responsibility to track borrowers and to develop repayment tracking and collection
mechanisms for the Attracting
Excellence to Teaching Program and the Enhancing Excellence in Teaching Program.
The department may contract for such services. When a loan has been forgiven
pursuant to section 79-8,137 or 79-8,137.04, the amount forgiven may be taxable income
to the borrower and the department shall provide notification of the amount
forgiven to the borrower, the Department of Revenue, and the United States
Internal Revenue Service if required by the Internal Revenue Code.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 21;

Laws 2009, LB547, § 13.